District of Columbia statutes.
21-2067

Recording of conservator’s letters.

(a)

Letters of conservatorship are evidence of the transfer of all assets, or the part of assets specified in the letters, of a protected individual to the conservator. An order terminating a conservatorship is evidence of the transfer of all assets subjected to the conservatorship from the conservator to the protected individual or to the personal representative of the individual.

(b)

Letters of conservatorship and orders terminating conservatorships shall be filed or recorded in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds to give record notice of title as between the conservator and the protected individual.

(c)

Letters of conservatorship shall be filed or recorded by the conservator and the conservator shall bear the costs of the filings. If the estate would be depleted by the payment of filing fees, the Recorder of Deeds may waive the fees.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

History

1981 Ed., § 21-2067.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-320 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).

Editor's Notes